Utah statutes.
10-2-608.   Contents of notice.

The notice required in the preceding section shall contain a summary of: (1) the contents of the resolutions or petitions for consolidation; (2) the consolidation plan; (3) where the resolutions or petitions and consolidation plan can be found; (4) the time and place where public hearings on the question of consolidation will be held and shall state that any interested person may be heard on the question of consolidation and on the plan for consolidation; (5) a description of the territory and the names of the municipalities which will be included within the proposed consolidated municipality which descriptions may be by any means which describe the territories involved; (6) the time and place or places at which the election for consolidation shall be held; and (7) the form of the ballot to be used in the election to determine the question of consolidation which shall read substantially as follows:

______________________________________________________________________________

Shall the municipality of ________	YES

be consolidated with the

municipality (or municipalities) of ________	NO

______________________________________________________________________________

The voters shall mark their ballots with a cross (x) opposite the words "yes" or "no."



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

